Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Chapter 18. Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Regulation Compact.

§§ 56-529,
56-530.

Repealed by Acts 2014, c. 805, cl. 11, effective October 1, 2014.

Cross references.

For current provisions of Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Regulation Compact, see §

33.2-3000

. For the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority Compact, see §

33.2-3100

.

Editor’s note.

Annotations and historical citations are set out under §§

33.2-3000

and

33.2-3100

.